Utah statutes.
31A-5-409.   Selection and removal of directors and officers of mutuals.
(1)  The articles or bylaws of a mutual shall state:
(a)  the number of directors of the mutual including the directors that are:
(i) appointed as public directors under this Subsection (1) and Subsection
(2); or
(ii)  elected under Subsection (3);
(b)  the number of directors of the mutual that may be appointed as public
directors; and
(c)  the plan that specifies the manner in which:
(i)  a public director is to be appointed; and
(ii)  a director who is not a public director is to be elected.
(2) (a)  The plan for the appointment of public directors specified in
Subsection (1) shall assure true public representation on the board.
(b)  A person appointed as a public director shall have insurance business or
other business or professional experience that qualifies that person to serve
responsibly and impartially as a director.
(c)  A public director may be an uncompensated member of the board of
directors.
(d)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2)(c), a public director shall meet the
qualifications of Subsection (2)(b).
(3) (a) A director who is not a public director shall be elected by:
(i)  the policyholders; or
(ii)  voting members.
(b)  If the directors who are not public directors are divided into classes,
one class shall be elected:
(i)  at least every four years; and
(ii)  for a term not exceeding six years.
(4)  A director may be removed from office for cause by an affirmative vote of
a majority of the full board at a meeting of the board called for that
purpose.
(5)  Subject to Subsections (1) through (4), Section 16-6a-810 applies to
vacancies on the governing board.
